Colorado statutes. TITLE 40 Utilities
PART 3
EMERGING COMPETITIVE TELECOMMUNICATIONS SERVICE

40-15-301. Regulation by the commission.

The commission shall regulate the terms and conditions, including rates and charges, under which telecommunications service pursuant to this part 3 is offered and provided to customers exclusively in accordance with the provisions of sections 40-4-101 (1), 40-4-111, 40-4-112, and 40-5-105 and articles 2, 3, 6, and 7 of this title, unless otherwise specified in this article.

Switched access is declared to be initially subject to regulation under this part 3, subject to section 40-15-307.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1484, § 1, effective July 2.

L. 94:

(2)(g) added, p. 1064, § 3, effective May 4.

L. 2000:

(2)(f) amended, p. 418, § 2, effective April 14.

L. 2014:

(2) amended, (HB 14-1329), ch. 150, p. 513, § 2, effective May 9; (2) amended, (HB 14-1331), ch. 152, p. 526, § 6, effective May 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 40-15-102 as it existed prior to 1987.

40-15-302. Manner of regulation - rules.

The commission shall promulgate rules as may be appropriate to regulate services and products provided pursuant to this part 3. In promulgating such rules, the commission shall consider such alternatives to traditional rate of return regulations as flexible pricing, detariffing, and other such manner and methods of regulation as are deemed consistent with the general assembly's expression of intent pursuant to section 40-15-101. If a provider applies for and receives commission approval of an alternative form of regulation, or if a provider is a rural telecommunications provider subject to simplified regulatory treatment under section 40-15-203.5 or 40-15-503 (2)(d), the commission shall not consider the provider's overall rate of return or overall revenue requirements when determining the just and reasonable rate for a particular product or service. A local exchange provider that does not elect an alternative form of regulation and that is subject to rate of return regulation shall furnish such rate of return information as requested by the commission.

For a rural telecommunications provider subject to simplified regulatory treatment under section 40-15-203.5 or 40-15-503 (2)(d), price ceilings shall be established for all products and services regulated under this part 3 as follows:

For switched access service, prices shall not rise above the level in effect on March 31, 1999; except that price ceilings may be adjusted by the commission to conform to its rules concerning the high cost support mechanism established under section 40-15-208 or to conform to any company filing that is subject to the commission's rate-of-return jurisdiction.

For all other products and services, price ceilings shall be established by reference to the prices for such products and services in effect under an alternative form of regulation approved by the commission.

This paragraph (b) shall not be construed to preclude a rural telecommunications provider from electing traditional rate-of-return regulation or requesting price regulation or another alternative form of regulation under part 5 of this article; and the fact of such election or request shall not be considered in connection with a proceeding to adjust prices for products or services offered under any alternative form of regulation.

The commission shall promulgate rules and regulations for the certification of providers of emerging competitive telecommunications services, but nothing in this part 3 shall require the commission to certificate providers of telecommunications service regulated in this part 3.

Repealed.

A provider of telecommunications service holding a certificate of public convenience and necessity to offer or provide services and products regulated pursuant to this part 3 immediately prior to July 2, 1987, shall continue to have such authority without having to make application to the commission for additional or continued authority.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1485, § 1, effective July 2.

L. 93:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 2081, § 52, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(5) added, p. 1064, § 4, effective May 4.

L. 96:

(5) amended, p. 365, § 1, effective August 7.

L. 99:

(1) amended, p. 186, § 5, effective March 31.

L. 2000:

(1)(a), IP(1)(b)(I), and (1)(b)(II) amended, p. 48, § 6, effective March 10; (5) amended, p. 418, § 3, effective April 14.

L. 2014:

(3) repealed, (HB 14-1331), ch. 152, p. 527, § 7, effective May 9; (5) amended, (HB 14-1330), ch. 151, p. 518, § 3, effective May 9.

L. 2019:

(5) repealed, (SB 19-236), ch. 359, p. 3315, § 22, effective May 30.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 40-15-104 as it existed prior to 1987.

40-15-302.5. Resellers of toll services - registration required.

Interexchange providers shall register with the commission in a form satisfactory to the commission. A registration must include, at a minimum, the following information updated within fifteen days after any change:

The interexchange provider's name and complete address;

All names under which the interexchange provider does business;

All names and identification numbers under which the interexchange provider has registered with the Colorado secretary of state or the Colorado department of revenue;

The name, title, address, and telephone number of an authorized representative to whom the commission may make inquiries; and

A toll-free telephone number to which consumer inquiries or complaints may be made.

An interexchange provider that registers in accordance with subsection (1) of this section is exempt from regulation by the commission except as otherwise provided in this section.

For the purpose of enforcing section 40-15-112, the commission may exercise any of the powers conferred under articles 1 to 7 of this title against an interexchange provider and, in cases of complaints filed under section 40-6-108, may order an interexchange provider to make due reparations to the complaining party.

Pursuant to section 24-50-504 (2)(a), C.R.S., the commission shall enter into personal services contracts that create an independent contractor relationship for the administration of this section and section 40-15-112.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire section added, p. 844, § 2, effective May 26.

L. 2004:

(4) amended, p. 1703, § 48, effective July 1, 2005.

L. 2014:

IP(1), (1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(c), (2), and (3) amended, (HB 14-1330), ch. 151, p. 518, § 4, effective May 9.

40-15-303. Transfer of certificate.

Any certificate of public convenience and necessity issued pursuant to this part 3 may be sold, assigned, leased, encumbered, or transferred as other property only upon authorization by the commission.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1485, § 1, effective July 2.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 40-15-106 as it existed prior to 1987.

40-15-304. Violations.

Violations of this part 3 by a telecommunications provider are subject to enforcement and penalties as provided in article 7 of this title.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1485, § 1, effective July 2.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 40-15-109 as it existed prior to 1987.

40-15-305. Time period for consideration of deregulation of emerging competitive telecommunications service.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this title, upon its own motion or upon application by any person, the commission shall deregulate, pursuant to part 4 of this article, specific telecommunications services subject to this part 3 upon a finding that there is effective competition in the relevant market for such service and that such deregulation will promote the public interest and the provision of adequate and reliable service at just and reasonable rates.

In determining whether effective competition for a specific telecommunications service exists, the commission shall make findings, after notice and opportunity for hearing, and shall issue an order based upon consideration of the following factors as the commission deems applicable in particular cases:

The extent of economic, technological, or other barriers to market entry and exit;

The number of other entities offering similar services;

The ability of consumers to obtain the service from other providers at reasonable and comparable rates, on comparable terms, and under comparable conditions;

The ability of any provider of such telecommunications service to affect prices or deter competition;

Such other relevant and necessary factors, including but not limited to relevant geographic areas, as the commission deems appropriate.

The commission shall approve or deny any such application for deregulation within one hundred eighty days after the filing of the application; except that the commission may, by order, defer the period within which it must act for one additional period of ninety days upon a finding that the proceeding cannot be completed within one hundred eighty days and that the additional time period is necessary for the commission to adequately and completely fulfill its duty under this subsection (1). If the commission has not acted on any such application within the appropriate time period permitted, the application shall be deemed granted.

In determining geographic areas under paragraph (b) of this subsection (1), the commission shall not be unduly restrictive.

Any telecommunications service or product not defined in part 1 of this article or not already classified pursuant to parts 2 to 4 of this article shall be classified as an emerging competitive telecommunications service under this part 3.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1486, § 1, effective July 2.

L. 2014:

(1)(b)(II) amended, (HB 14-1330), ch. 151, p. 519, § 5, effective May 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 40-15-110 as it existed prior to 1987.

40-15-306. IntraLATA interexchange services. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 87:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1486, § 1, effective July 2.

L. 2014:

Entire section repealed, (HB 14-1331), ch. 152, p. 527, § 8, effective May 9.

40-15-307. Switched access.

Switched access shall not be deregulated pursuant to section 40-15-305 prior to the enactment of enabling legislation authorizing such deregulation.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1487, § 1, effective July 2.

40-15-308. Private line services. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 87:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1487, § 1, effective July 2.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 2081, § 53, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

Entire section repealed, p. 419, § 4, effective April 14.